CHAPTER 10 THOROUGHBRED AND QUARTER HORSE RACING (Update effective July 30, 2003) (Added new subrule 10.6(19)) 491--10.1(99D) Terms defined.
As used in the rules, unless the context otherwise requires, the following definitions apply: "Age" means the age of a horse reckoned from the first day of January of the year of foaling.
"Allowance race" means an overnight race for which eligibility and weight to be carried are determined according to specified conditions that include age, sex, earnings, and number of wins.
"Also eligible" means: 1.
A number of eligible horses, properly entered, which were not drawn for inclusion in a race but which become eligible according to preference or lot when an entry is scratched prior to the scratch time deadline; or 2.
The next preferred nonqualifier for the finals or consolation from a set of elimination trials that will become eligible in the event a finalist is scratched by the stewards for a rule violation or is otherwise eligible if written race conditions permit.
"Appeal" means a request for the commission or its designee to investigate, consider, and review any decisions or rulings of stewards.
"Arrears" means all moneys owed by a licensee, including subscriptions, jockey fees, forfeitures, and any default incident to these rules.
"Authorized agent" means a person licensed by the commission and appointed by a written instrument, signed and acknowledged before a notary public by the owner on whose behalf the agent will act.
"Bleeder" means a horse that hemorrhages from within the respiratory tract during a race, within one and one-half hours postrace, during exercise or within one and one-half hours of exercise.
"Bleeder list" means a tabulation of all bleeders to be maintained by the commission.
"Chemist" means any official racing chemist designated by the commission.
"Claiming race" means a race which includes a condition that any horse starting the race may be claimed and purchased by any licensed owner, or person(s) approved by the commission for an owner's license, for an amount specified in the conditions for that race by the racing secretary.
"Commission" means the racing and gaming commission.
"Conditions" means qualifications that determine a horse's eligibility to be entered in a race.
"Contest" means a competitive racing event on which pari-mutuel wagering is conducted.
"Coupled entry" means two or more contestants in a contest that are treated as a single betting interest for pari-mutuel wagering purposes.
(See also "Entry.")
"Day" means a 24-hour period ending at midnight.
"Dead heat" means when the noses of two or more horses reach the finish line of a race at the same time.
"Declaration" means the act of withdrawing an entered horse from a race prior to the closing of entries.
"Detention barn" means the barn designated for the collection from horses of test samples under the supervision of the commission veterinarian; also the barn assigned by the commission to a horse on the bleeder list, for occupancy as a prerequisite for receiving bleeder medication.
1 "Entry" means a horse made eligible to run in a race; or two or more horses, entered in the same race, which have common ties of ownership, lease, or training.
(See also "Coupled entry.")
"Facility" means an entity licensed by the commission to conduct pari-mutuel wagering or gaming operations in Iowa.
"Facility grounds" means all real property utilized by the facility in the conduct of its race meeting, including the racetrack, grandstand, concession stands, offices, barns, stable area, employee housing facilities, parking lots, and any other areas under the jurisdiction of the commission.
"Field or mutuel field" means a group of two or more horses upon which a single bet may be placed.
A mutuel field is required when the number of horses starting in a race exceeds the capacity of the track totalizator.
The highest numbered horse within the totalizator capacity and all the higher-numbered horses following are then grouped together in the mutuel field.
"Foreign substances" means all substances except those that exist naturally in the untreated horse at normal physiological concentration.
"Forfeit" means money due from a licensee because of an error, fault, neglect of duty, breach of contract, or penalty imposed by the stewards or the commission.
"Handicap" means a race in which the weights to be carried by the horses are assigned by the racing secretary or handicapper for the purpose of equalizing the chances of winning for all horses entered.
"Horse" means any equine (including equine designated as a mare, filly, stallion, colt, ridgeling, or gelding) registered for racing; specifically, an entire male 5 years of age and older.
"Hypodermic injection" means any injection into or under the skin or mucosa, including intradermal injection, subcutaneous injection, submucosal injection, intramuscular injection, intravenous injection, intra-arterial injection, intra-articular injection, intrabursal injection, and intraocular (intraconjunctival) injection.
"Inquiry" means an investigation by the stewards of potential interference in a contest prior to declaring the result of said contest official.
"Jockey" means a professional rider licensed to ride in races.
"Licensee" means any person or entity licensed by the commission to engage in racing or related regulated activity.
"Maiden race" means a contest restricted to nonwinners.
"Meet/meeting" means the specified period and dates each year during which a facility is authorized by the commission to conduct pari-mutuel wagering on horse racing.
"Month" means a calendar month.
"Nomination" means the naming of a horse to a certain race or series of races generally accompanied by payment of a prescribed fee.
"Nominator" means the person or entity in whose name a horse is nominated for a race or series of races.
"Objection" means: 1.
A written complaint made to the stewards concerning a horse entered in a race and filed not later than two hours prior to the scheduled post time of the first race on the day in which the questioned horse is entered; or 2.
A verbal claim of foul in a race lodged by the horse's jockey, trainer, owner, or the owner's authorized agent before the race is declared official.
2 "Official starter" means the official responsible for dispatching the horses for a race.
"Official time" means the elapsed time from the moment the first horse crosses the starting point until the first horse crosses the finish line.
"Overnight race" means a race for which entries close 96 hours, or less, before the time set for the first race of the day on which the race is to be run.
"Owner" means a person or entity that holds any title, right or interest, whole or partial, in a horse, including the lessee and lessor of a horse.
"Paddock" means an enclosure in which horses scheduled to compete in a contest are saddled prior to racing.
"Performance" means a schedule of 8 to 12 races per day unless otherwise authorized by the commission.
"Post position" means the preassigned position from which a horse will leave the starting gate.
"Post time" means the scheduled starting time for a contest.
"Prize" means the combined total of any cash, premium, trophy, and object of value awarded to the owners of horses according to order of finish in a race.
"Purse" means the total cash amount for which a race is contested.
"Purse race" means a race for money or other prize to which the owners of horses entered do not contribute money toward its purse and for which entries close less than 96 hours prior to its running.
"Race" means a running contest between horses ridden by jockeys for a purse, prize, or other reward run at a facility in the presence of the stewards of the meeting.
This includes purse races, overnight races and stakes races.
"Recognized meeting" means any meeting with regularly scheduled races for horses on the flat in a jurisdiction having reciprocal relations with this state and the commission for the mutual enforcement of rulings relating to horse racing.
"Rules" means the rules promulgated by the commission to regulate the conduct of horse racing.
"Scratch" means the act of withdrawing an entered horse from a contest after the closing of entries.
"Scratch time" means the deadline set by the facility for withdrawal of entries from a scheduled performance.
"Smoke" means the procedure of reviewing entries for correctness, eligibility, weight allowances, and medications.
"Stakes race" means a contest in which nomination, entry, and starting fees contribute to the purse.
"Starter" means a horse that becomes an actual contestant in a race by virtue of the starting gate opening in front of it upon dispatch by the official starter.
"Steward" means a duly appointed racing official with powers and duties specified by rules.
"Subscription" means moneys paid for nomination, entry, eligibility, or starting of a horse in a stakes race.
"Test level" means the concentration of a foreign substance found in the test sample.
"Test sample" means any bodily substance including, but not limited to, blood or urine taken from a horse under the supervision of the commission veterinarian and as prescribed by the commission for the purpose of analysis.
"Totalizator" means the system used for recording, calculating, and disseminating information 3 about ticket sales, wagers, odds, and payoff prices to patrons at a pari-mutuel wagering facility.
"Veterinarian" means a veterinarian holding a current unrestricted license issued by the state of Iowa veterinary regulatory authority and licensed by the commission.
"Winner" means the horse whose nose reaches the finish line first or is placed first through disqualification by the stewards.
"Year" means a calendar year.
491--10.2(99D) Facilities' responsibilities.
10.2(1) Stalls.
The facility shall ensure that racing animals are stabled in individual box stalls; that the stables and immediate surrounding area are maintained in approved sanitary condition at all times; that satisfactory drainage is provided; and that manure and other refuse are kept in separate boxes or containers at locations distant from living quarters and promptly and properly removed.
10.2(2) Paddocks and equipment.
The facility shall ensure that paddocks, starting gates, and other equipment subject to contact by different animals are kept in a clean condition and free of dangerous surfaces.
10.2(3) Receiving barn and stalls.
Each facility shall provide a conveniently located receiving barn or stalls for the use of horses arriving during the meeting.
The barn shall have adequate stable room and facilities, hot and cold water, and stall bedding.
The facility shall employ attendants to operate and maintain the receiving barn or stalls in a clean and healthy condition.
10.2(4) Fire protection.
The facility shall develop and implement a program for fire prevention on facility grounds in accordance with applicable state fire codes.
The facility shall instruct employees working on facility grounds in procedures for fire prevention and evacuation.
The facility shall, in accordance with state fire codes, prohibit the following: a.
Smoking in horse stalls, feed and tack rooms, and in the alleyways. b. Sleeping in feed rooms or stalls. c. Open fires and oil- or gasoline-burning lanterns or lamps in the stable area.
d. Leaving any electrical appliance unattended or in unsafe proximity to walls, beds, or furnishings.
e. Keeping flammable materials, including cleaning fluids or solvents, in the stable area.
f. Locking a stall which is occupied by a horse.
The facility shall post a notice in the stable area which lists the prohibitions outlined in 10.2(4)"a" to "f" above.
10.2(5) Starting gate. a.
During racing hours a facility shall provide at least two operable padded starting gates that have been approved by the commission.
b.
During designated training hours a facility shall make at least one starting gate and qualified starting gate employee available for schooling. c.
If a race is started at a place other than in a chute, the facility shall provide and maintain in good operating condition backup equipment for moving the starting gate.
The backup equipment must be immediately available to replace the primary moving equipment in the event of failure.
10.2(6) Distance markers. a.
A facility shall provide and maintain starting point markers and distance poles in a size and 4 position that can be clearly seen from the steward's stand.
b.
The starting point markers and distance poles must be marked as follows: 1/4 poles red and white horizontal stripes 1/8 poles green and white horizontal stripes 1/16 poles black and white horizontal stripes 220 yards green and white 250 yards blue 300 yards yellow 330 yards black and white 350 yards red 400 yards black 440 yards red and white 550 yards black and white horizontal stripes 660 yards green and white horizontal stripes 770 yards black and white horizontal stripes 870 yards blue and white horizontal stripes 10.2(7) Detention enclosure.
Each facility shall maintain a detention enclosure for use by the commission for securing samples of urine, saliva, blood, or other bodily substances or tissues for chemical analysis from horses who have run in a race.
The enclosure shall include a wash rack, commission veterinarian office, a walking ring, at least four stalls, workroom for the sample collectors with hot and cold running water, and glass observation windows for viewing of the horses from the office and workroom.
An owner, trainer, or designated representative licensed by the commission shall be with a horse in the detention barn at all times.
10.2(8) Ambulance.
A facility shall maintain, on the grounds during every day that its track is open for racing or exercising, an ambulance for humans and an ambulance for horses, equipped according to prevailing standards and staffed by medical doctors, paramedics, or other personnel trained to operate them.
When an ambulance is used for transfer of a horse or patient to medical facilities, a replacement ambulance must be furnished by the facility to comply with this rule.
10.2(9) Helmets and vests.
A facility shall not allow any person to exercise any horse on facility grounds unless that person is wearing a protective helmet and safety vest of a type approved by the commission.
10.2(10) Racetrack. a.
The surface of a racetrack, including cushion, subsurface, and base, must be designed, constructed, and maintained to provide for the safety of the jockeys and racing animals.
b. Distances to be run shall be measured from the starting line at a distance three feet out from the inside rail. c.
A facility shall provide an adequate drainage system for the racetrack. d.
A facility shall provide adequate equipment and personnel to maintain the track surface in a safe training and racing condition.
The facility shall provide backup equipment for maintaining the track surface.
A facility that conducts races on a turf track shall: (1) Maintain an adequate stockpile of growing medium; and (2) Provide a system capable of adequately watering the entire turf course evenly.
e. Rails.
5 (1) Racetracks, including turf tracks, shall have inside and outside rails, including gap rails, designed, constructed, and maintained to provide for the safety of jockeys and horses.
The design and construction of rails must be approved by the commission prior to the first race meeting at the track.
(2) The top of the rail must be at least 38 inches but not more than 44 inches above the top of the cushion.
The inside rail shall have no less than a 24-inch overhang with a continuous smooth cover.
(3) All rails must be constructed of materials designed to withstand the impact of a horse running at a gallop.
10.2(11) Patrol films or videotapes.
Each facility shall provide: a.
A videotaping system approved by the commission.
Cameras must be located to provide clear panoramic and head-on views of each race.
Separate monitors, which simultaneously display the images received from each camera and are capable of simultaneously displaying a synchronized view of the recordings of each race for review, shall be provided in the stewards' stand.
The location and construction of video towers must be approved by the commission.
b.
One camera, designated by the commission, to videotape the prerace loading of all horses into the starting gate and to continue to videotape them until the field is dispatched by the starter. c.
One camera, designated by the commission, to videotape the apparent winner of each race from the finish line until the horse has returned, the jockey has dismounted, and the equipment has been removed from the horse.
d.
At the discretion of the stewards, video camera operators to videotape the activities of any horses or persons handling horses prior to, during, or following a race. e.
That races run on an oval track be recorded by at least three video cameras.
Races run on a straight course must be recorded by at least two video cameras.
f. Upon request to the commission, without cost, a copy of a videotape of a race. g. Videotapes recorded prior to, during, and following each race maintained by the facility for not less than six months after the end of the race meeting, or such other period as may be requested by the stewards or the commission.
h.
A viewing room in which, on approval by the stewards, an owner, trainer, jockey, or other interested individual may view a videotape recording of a race. i. Following any race in which there is an inquiry or objection, the videotaped replays of the incident in question which were utilized by the stewards in making their decision.
The licensee shall display to the public these videotaped replays on designated monitors.
10.2(12) Communications.
a.
Each facility shall provide and maintain in good working order a communication system between: (1) The stewards' stand; (2) The racing office; (3) The tote room; (4) The jockeys' room; (5) The paddock; (6) The test barn; (7) The starting gate; (8) The weigh-in scale; 6 (9) The video camera locations; (10) The clocker's stand; (11) The racing veterinarian; (12) The track announcer; (13) The location of the ambulances (equine and human); and (14) Other locations and persons designated by the commission.
b.
A facility shall provide and maintain a public address system capable of clearly transmitting announcements to the patrons and to the stable area.
491--10.3(99D) Facility policies.
It shall be the affirmative responsibility and continuing duty of each occupational licensee to follow and comply with the facility policies as published in literature distributed by the facility or posted in a conspicuous location.
491--10.4(99D) Racing officials.
10.4(1) General description.
Every facility conducting a race meeting shall appoint at least the following officials: a.
One of the members of a three-member board of stewards; b. Racing secretary; c. Assistant racing secretary; d. Paddock judge; e. Horse identifier; f. Clerk of the course; g. Starter; h. Clocker/timer; i. Three placing judges; j. Jockey room custodian; k. Mutuel manager; l.
Clerk of scales; m. Minimum of two outriders; n. Horsemen's bookkeeper; o.
Any other person designated by the commission.
10.4(2) Officials' prohibited activities.
No racing official or racing official's assistant(s) listed in 10.4(1) while serving in that capacity during any meeting may engage in any of the following: a.
Enter into a business or employment that would be a conflict of interest, interfere with, or conflict with the proper discharge of duties including a business that does business with a facility or a business issued a concession operator's license; b. Participate in the sale, purchase, or ownership of any horse racing at the meeting; c.
Be involved in any way in the purchase or sale of any contract on any jockey racing at the meeting; d. Sell or solicit horse insurance on any horse racing at the meeting, or any other business sales or solicitation not a part of the official's duties; e. Wager on the outcome of any race under the jurisdiction of the commission; f. Accept or receive money or anything of value for the official's assistance in connection with the official's duties; 7 g. Consume or be under the influence of alcohol or any prohibited substance while performing official duties.
10.4(3) Single official appointment.
No official appointed to any meeting, except placing judges, may hold more than one official position listed in 10.4(1) unless, in the determination of the stewards or commission, the holding of more than one appointment would not subject the official to a conflict of interest or duties in the two appointments.
10.4(4) Stewards.
(For practice and procedure before the stewards and the commission, see 491--Chapter 4.)
a.
General authority.
(1) General.
The board of stewards for each racing meet shall be responsible to the commission for the conduct of the racing meet in accordance with the laws of this state and the rules adopted by the commission.
The stewards shall have authority to regulate and to resolve conflicts or disputes between all other racing officials, licensees, and those persons addressed by 491--paragraph 4.6(5)"e," which are reasonably related to the conduct of a race or races and to discipline violators of these rules in accordance with the provisions of these rules.
(2) Period of authority.
The stewards' authority as set forth in this subrule shall commence 30 days prior to the beginning of each racing meet and shall terminate 30 days after the end of each racing meet or with the completion of their business pertaining to the meeting.
(3) Attendance.
All three stewards shall be present in the stand during the running of each race.
(4) Appointment of substitute.
Should any steward be absent at race time, the state steward(s) shall appoint a deputy for the absent steward.
If any deputy steward is appointed, the commission shall be notified immediately by the stewards.
(5) Initiate action.
The stewards shall take notice of questionable conduct or rule violations, with or without complaint, and shall initiate investigations promptly and render a decision on every objection and every complaint made to them.
(6) General enforcement provisions.
Stewards shall enforce the laws of Iowa and the rules of the commission.
The laws of Iowa and the rules of racing apply equally during periods of racing.
They supersede the conditions of a race and the regulations of a racing meet and, in matters pertaining to racing, the orders of the stewards supersede the orders of the officers of the facility.
The decision of the stewards as to the extent of a disqualification of any horse in any race shall be final for purposes of distribution of the pari-mutuel pool. b.
Other powers and authority.
(1) The stewards shall have the power to interpret the rules and to decide all questions not specifically covered by them.
(2) All questions within their authority shall be determined by a majority of the stewards.
(3) The stewards shall have control over and access to all areas of the facility grounds.
(4) The stewards shall have the authority to determine all questions arising with reference to entries and racing.
Persons entering horses to run at licensed facilities agree in so doing to accept the decision of the stewards on any questions relating to a race or racing.
The stewards, in their sole discretion, are authorized to determine whether two or more individuals or entities are operating as a single financial interest or as separate financial interests.
In making this determination, the stewards shall consider all relevant information including, but not limited to, the following: 1.
Whether the parties pay bills from and deposit receipts in the same accounts.
8 2.
Whether the parties share resources such as employees, feed, supplies, veterinary and farrier services, exercise and pony riders, tack, and equipment.
3.
Whether the parties switch horses or owner/trainer for no apparent reason, other than to avoid restrictions of being treated as a single interest.
4.
Whether the parties engage in separate racing operations in other jurisdictions.
5.
Whether the parties have claimed horses, or transferred claimed horses after the fact, for the other's benefit.
6.
If owners, whether one owner is paying the expenses for horses not in the owner's name as owner.
7.
If trainers, whether the relationship between the parties is more consistent with that of a trainer and assistant trainer.
(5) The stewards shall have the authority to discipline, for violation of the rules, any person subject to their control and, in their discretion, to impose fines or suspensions or both for infractions.
(6) The stewards shall have the authority to order the exclusion or ejection from all premises and enclosures of the facility any person who is disqualified for corrupt practices on any race course in any country.
(7) The stewards shall have the authority to call for proof that a horse is itself not disqualified in any respect, or nominated by, or, wholly or in part, the property of, a disqualified person.
In default of proof being given to their satisfaction, the stewards may declare the horse disqualified.
(8) The stewards shall have the authority at any time to order an examination of any horse entered for a race or which has run in a race.
(9) In order to maintain necessary safety and health conditions and to protect the public confidence in horse racing as a sport, the stewards have the authority to authorize a person(s) on their behalf to enter into or upon the buildings, barns, motor vehicles, trailers, or other places within the grounds of a facility, to examine same, and to inspect and examine the person, personal property, and effects of any person within such place, and to seize any illegal articles or any items as evidence found.
(10) The stewards shall maintain a log of all infractions of the rules and of all rulings of the stewards upon matters coming before them during the race meet.
(11) The state stewards must give prior approval for any person other than the commissioners or commission representative to be allowed in the stewards' stand.
c. Emergency authority.
(1) Substitute officials.
When in an emergency, any official is unable to discharge the official's duties, the stewards may approve the appointment of a substitute and shall report it immediately to the commission.
(2) Substitute jockeys.
The stewards have the authority, in an emergency, to place a substitute jockey on any horse in the event the trainer does not do so.
Before using that authority, the stewards shall in good faith attempt to inform the trainer of the emergency and to afford the trainer the opportunity to appoint a substitute jockey.
If the trainer cannot be contacted, or if the trainer is contacted but fails to appoint a substitute jockey and inform the stewards of the substitution by 30 minutes prior to post time, then the stewards may appoint under this rule.
(3) Substitute trainer.
The stewards have the authority in an emergency to designate a substitute trainer for any horse.
9 (4) Excuse horse.
In case of accident or injury to a horse or any other emergency deemed by the stewards before the start of any race, the stewards may excuse the horse from starting.
(5) Exercise authority.
No licensee may exercise a horse on the track between races unless upon the approval of the stewards.
(6) Nonstarter.
At the discretion of the stewards, any horse(s) precluded from having a fair start may be declared a nonstarter, and any wagers involving said horse(s) may be ordered refunded. d. Investigations and decisions.
(1) Investigations.
The stewards may, upon direction of the commission, conduct inquiries and shall recommend to the commission the issuance of subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of reports, books, papers, and documents for any inquiry.
The commission stewards have the power to administer oaths and examine witnesses.
The stewards shall submit a written report to the commission of every such inquiry made by them.
(2) Form reversal.
The stewards shall take notice of any marked reversal of form by any horse and shall conduct an inquiry of the horse's owner, trainer, or other persons connected with the horse including any person found to have contributed to the deliberate restraint or impediment of a horse in order to cause it not to win or finish as near as possible to first.
(3) Fouls.
1.
Extent of disqualification.
Upon any claim of foul submitted to them, the stewards shall determine the extent of any disqualification and place any horse found to be disqualified behind others in the race with which it interfered or may place the offending horse last in the race.
The stewards at their discretion may determine if there was sufficient interference or intimidation to affect the outcome of the race and take the appropriate actions thereafter.
2.
Coupled entry.
When a horse is disqualified under 10.4(4)"d"(3)"1" and that horse was a part of a coupled entry and, in the opinion of the stewards, the act which led to the disqualification served to unduly benefit the other part of the coupled entry, the stewards may disqualify the other part of the entry.
3.
Jockey guilty of foul.
The stewards may discipline any jockey whose horse has been disqualified as a result of a foul committed during the running of a race.
(4) Protests and complaints.
The stewards shall investigate promptly and render a decision in every protest and complaint made to them.
They shall keep a record of all protests and complaints and any rulings made by the stewards and shall file reports daily with the commission.
1.
Involving fraud.
Protests involving fraud may be made by any person at any time.
The protest must be made to the stewards.
2.
Not involving fraud.
Protests, except those involving fraud, may be filed only by the owner of a horse, authorized agent, trainer, or the jockey of the horse in the race over which the protest is made.
The protest must be made to the clerk of scales, the stewards, or a person designated by the stewards before the race is declared official.
If the placement of the starting gate is in error, no protest may be made, unless entered prior to the start of the race.
3.
Protest to clerk of scales.
A jockey who intends to enter a protest following the running of any race, and before the race is declared official, shall notify the clerk of scales, or a person designated by the stewards, of this intention immediately upon the arrival of the jockey at the scales.
10 4.
Prize money of protested horse.
During the time of determination of a protest, any money or prize won by a horse protested or otherwise affected by the outcome of the race shall be paid to and held by the horsemen's bookkeeper until the protest is decided.
5.
Protest in writing.
A protest, other than one arising out of the actual running of a race, must be in writing, signed by the complainant, and filed with the stewards not later than one hour before post time of the race out of which the protest arises.
6.
Frivolous protests.
No person shall make a frivolous protest nor may any person withdraw a protest without the permission of the stewards.
10.4(5) Racing secretary.
a.
General authority.
The racing secretary is responsible for setting the conditions for each race of the meeting, regulating the nomination of entries, determining the amounts of purses and to whom they are due, and recording of race results.
The racing secretary shall permit no person other than licensed racing officials to enter the racing secretary's office or work areas until such time as all entries are closed, drawn, and smoked.
Exceptions to this rule must be approved by the stewards. b. Conditions.
The racing secretary shall establish the conditions and eligibility for entering the races of the meeting and cause them to be published to owners, trainers, and the commission.
Corrections to the conditions must be made before entries are taken.
c. Posting of entries.
Upon the closing of entries each day, the racing secretary shall post a list of entries in a conspicuous location in the office of the racing secretary and shall furnish that list to local newspaper, radio, and television stations.
d. Stakes and entrance money records.
The racing secretary shall be caretaker of the permanent records of all stakes, entrance moneys, and arrears paid or due in a race meeting and shall keep permanent records of the results of each race of the meeting.
e. Record of racing.
The racing secretary shall, no later than the day following each race, attach or endorse on the registration certificate of each horse winning in any race the fact of that winning performance and the distance, date of the race, and the type or conditions of the race. f. Naming/engaging of riders.
Riders must be named at the time of entry or no later than scratch time.
Before naming any rider, the trainer, owner, or other person authorized must first engage the services of the rider and state on the entry or to the clerk of scales whether it is a first or second call.
Riders properly engaged must fulfill their engagements as required in 10.5(2)"l." g. Handicapping.
The racing secretary, or a handicapper assigned by the racing secretary, shall assign the weight to be carried by each horse in a handicap when weights are not stated in the condition of the race: (1) Scale of weights for age.
The scale of weights for age hereinafter listed shall be carried when conditions of races do not otherwise specify: Distance Age Two Years HALF MILE Three Years Four Years Five Years and Up Jan X 117 130 130 Feb X 117 130 130 Mar X 119 130 130 Apr X 119 130 130 May X 121 130 130 Jun X 123 130 130 Jul X 125 130 130 Aug 105 126 130 130 Sep 108 127 130 130 Oct 111 128 130 130 Nov 114 129 130 130 Dec 114 129 130 130 11 Two Years SIX FURLONGS Three Years Four Years Five Years and Up Two Years ONE MILE Three Years Four Years Five Years and Up Two Years MILE AND A QUARTER Three Years Four Years Five Years and Up Two Years MILE AND A HALF Three Years Four Years Five Years and Up Two Years TWO MILES Three Years Four Years Five Years and Up X 114 129 130 X 107 127 128 X 101 125 127 X 98 124 126 X 96 124 126 X 114 129 130 X 107 127 128 X 101 125 127 X 98 124 126 X 96 124 126 X 117 130 130 X 111 128 128 X 107 127 127 X 104 126 126 X 102 126 126 X 117 130 130 X 111 128 128 X 107 127 127 X 104 126 126 X 102 126 126 X 119 130 130 X 113 127 127 X 111 127 127 X 108 126 126 X 106 126 126 X 121 130 130 X 115 126 126 X 113 126 126 X 111 126 126 X 109 126 126 X 123 130 130 X 117 126 126 X 116 126 126 X 114 126 126 X 112 126 126 102 125 130 130 X 119 126 126 X 118 126 126 X 117 126 126 X 114 125 125 105 126 130 130 96 121 126 126 X 120 126 126 X 119 126 126 X 117 125 125 108 127 130 130 99 122 126 126 X 121 126 126 X 121 126 126 X 119 124 124 111 128 130 130 102 123 126 126 X 122 126 126 X 122 126 126 X 120 124 124 111 128 130 130 102 123 126 126 X 122 126 126 X 122 126 126 X 120 124 124 (2) Weights listed.
1.
In races of intermediate lengths, the weights for the shorter distance shall be carried.
2.
In a race exclusively for two-year-olds, the weight shall be 122 pounds.
3.
In a race exclusively for three-year-olds or four-year-olds, the weight shall be 126 pounds.
(3) Minimum weight.
1.
Thoroughbreds.
In all overnight races for two-year-olds, three-year-olds, or four-year-olds and older, the minimum weight shall be 112 pounds, subject to sex and apprentice allowance.
This rule shall not apply to handicaps or to races written for three-year-olds and older.
2.
Quarter horse and mixed races.
In all overnight races for two-year-olds, the weight shall be 120 pounds; for three-year-olds, the weight shall be 122 pounds; and for four-year-olds and older, the weight shall be 124 pounds.
3.
Quarter horse and mixed races.
In qualifying for a speed index, standard weight shall be 120 pounds.
Should any horse carry less than this amount in a race, one-tenth of a second will be added to the official time for each four pounds or fraction thereof less than 120 pounds.
(4) Sex allowances.
For thoroughbred racing only, sex allowances are obligatory.
In all races 12 except stakes, handicaps, and races where the conditions expressly state to the contrary, two-year-old fillies are allowed three pounds; mares three years old and older are allowed five pounds before September 1 and three pounds thereafter.
Sex allowances are not applicable for quarter horse or mixed races.
h. Penalties not cumulative.
Penalties and weight allowances are not cumulative unless so declared in the conditions of a race by the racing secretary.
i. Winnings.
(1) All inclusive.
For the purpose of the setting of conditions by the racing secretary, winnings shall be considered to include all moneys and prizes won up to the time of the start of a race, including those races outside the United States.
Foreign winnings shall be determined on the basis of the normal rate of exchange prevailing on the day of the win.
The amount of purse money earned is credited in United States currency, and there shall be no appeal for any loss on the exchange rate at the time of transfer from United States currency to that of another country.
(2) Winnings considered from January 1.
Winnings during the year shall be reckoned by the racing secretary from the preceding January 1.
(3) Winner of a certain sum.
"Winner of a certain sum" means the winner of a single race of that sum, unless otherwise expressed in the condition book by the racing secretary.
In determining the net value to the winner of any race, the sums contributed by its owner or nominator shall be deducted from the amount won.
In all stakes races, the winnings shall be computed on the value of the gross earnings.
(4) Winner's award.
Rescinded 6/20/2001. j. Cancellation of a race.
The racing secretary has the authority to withdraw, cancel, or change any race which has not been closed.
In the event the race is canceled, any and all fees paid in connection with the race shall be refunded. k. Coggins test.
The racing secretary shall ensure that all horses have a current negative Coggins test.
The racing secretary shall report all expired certificates to the stewards. l.
Registrations and supporting documents.
The racing secretary shall be responsible for receiving, inspecting, and safeguarding all registrations and supporting documents submitted by the trainer while the horses are located on facility grounds.
Upon notification from a trainer of an alteration of the sex of a horse, the racing secretary shall note such alteration on the certificate of registration.
Disclosure is made for the benefit of the public and all documents pertaining to the ownership or lease of a horse filed with the racing secretary shall be available for public inspection.
10.4(6) Paddock judge.
a.
General authority.
The paddock judge shall: (1) Supervise the assembly of horses in the paddock no later than 15 minutes before the scheduled post time for each race; (2) Maintain a written record of all equipment, inspect all equipment of each horse saddled, and report any change thereof to the stewards; (3) Prohibit any change of equipment without the approval of the stewards; (4) Ensure that the saddling of all horses is orderly, open to public view, free from public interference, and that horses are mounted at the same time and leave the paddock for the post in proper sequence; (5) Supervise paddock schooling of all horses approved for such by the stewards; 13 (6) Report to the stewards any observed cruelty to a horse; and (7) Ensure that only properly authorized persons are permitted in the paddock. b. Paddock judge's list.
(1) The paddock judge shall maintain a list of horses which shall not be entered in a race because of poor or inconsistent behavior in the paddock that endangers the health or safety of other participants in racing.
(2) At the end of each day, the paddock judge shall provide a copy of the list to the stewards.
(3) To be removed from the paddock judge's list, a horse must be schooled in the paddock and demonstrate to the satisfaction of the paddock judge and the stewards that the horse is capable of performing safely in the paddock.
10.4(7) Horse identifier.
The horse identifier shall: a.
When required, ensure the safekeeping of registration certificates and racing permits for horses stabled or racing on facility grounds; b. Inspect documents of ownership, eligibility, registration, or breeding necessary to ensure the proper identification of each horse scheduled to compete at a race meeting; c. Examine every starter in the paddock for sex, color, markings, and lip tattoo for comparison with its registration certificate to verify the horse's identity; d. Supervise the tattooing or branding for identification of any horse located on facility grounds; and e. Report to the stewards any horse not properly identified or whose registration certificate is not in conformity with these rules.
10.4(8) Starter. a.
General authority.
The starter shall: (1) Have complete jurisdiction over the starting gate, the starting of horses, and the authority to give orders not in conflict with the rules as may be required to ensure all participants an equal opportunity to a fair start; (2) Appoint and supervise assistant starters who have demonstrated they are adequately trained to safely handle horses in the starting gate.
In emergency situations, the starter may appoint qualified individuals to act as substitute assistant starters; (3) Assign the starting gate stall positions to assistant starters and notify the assistant starters of their respective stall positions more than ten minutes before post time for the race; (4) Assess the ability of each person applying for a jockey's license in breaking from the starting gate and working a horse in the company of other horses, and shall make said assessment known to the stewards; and (5) Load horses into the gate in any order deemed necessary to ensure a safe and fair start.
b. Assistant starters.
With respect to an official race, the assistant starters shall not: (1) Handle or take charge of any horse in the starting gate without the expressed permission of the starter; (2) Impede the start of a race; (3) Use excessive force, apply a whip or other device, with the exception of steward-approved tongs, to assist in loading a horse into the starting gate; (4) Slap, boot, or otherwise dispatch a horse from the starting gate; (5) Strike or use abusive language to a jockey; or (6) Accept or solicit any gratuity or payment other than their regular salary, directly or 14 indirectly, for services in starting a race. c. Starter's list.
No horse shall be permitted to start in a race unless approval is given by the starter.
The starter shall maintain a starter's list of all horses which are ineligible to be entered in any race because of poor or inconsistent behavior or performance in the starting gate.
Any horse on the starter's list shall be refused entry until the horse has demonstrated to the starter that it has been satisfactorily schooled in the gate and can be removed from the starter's list.
Schooling shall be under the direct supervision of the starter.
10.4(9) Timer/clocker. a.
General authority--timer.
(1) The timer shall accurately record the official time.
(2) At the end of a race, the timer shall post the official running time on the infield totalizator board on instruction by the stewards.
(3) At a facility equipped with an appropriate infield totalizator board, the timer shall post the quarter times (splits) for thoroughbred races in fractions as a race is being run.
For quarter horse races, the timer shall post the official times in hundredths of a second.
(4) For backup purposes, the timer shall also use a stopwatch to time all races.
In time trials, the timer shall ensure that at least two stopwatches are used by the stewards or their representatives.
(5) The timer shall maintain, and make available for inspection by the stewards or the commission on request, a written record of fractional and finish times of each race. b. General authority--clocker.
(1) The clocker shall be present during training hours at each track on facility grounds which is open for training to identify each horse working out and to accurately record the distances and times of each horse's workout.
(2) Each day, the clocker shall prepare a list of workouts that includes the name of each horse which worked along with the distance and time of each horse's workout.
(3) At the conclusion of training hours, the clocker shall deliver a copy of the list of workouts to the stewards and the racing secretary.
10.4(10) Placing judges.
a.
General authority.
The placing judges shall determine the order of finish in a race as the horses pass the finish line and, with the approval of the stewards, may display the results on the totalizator board.
b. Photo finish.
(1) In the event the placing judges or the stewards request a photo of the finish, the photo finish sign shall be posted on the totalizator board.
(2) Following their review of the photo finish film strip, the placing judges shall, with the approval of the stewards, determine the exact order of finish for all horses participating in the race, and shall immediately post the numbers of the first four finishers on the totalizator board.
(3) In the event a photo was requested, the placing judges shall cause a photographic print of said finish to be produced.
The finish photograph shall, when needed, be used by the placing judges as an aid in determining the correct order of finish.
(4) Upon determination of the correct order of finish of a race in which the placing judges have utilized a photographic print to determine the first four finishers, the placing judges shall cause prints of said photograph to be displayed publicly in the grandstand and clubhouse areas of the 15 facility.
c. Dead heats.
(1) In the event the placing judges determine that two or more horses finished the race simultaneously and cannot be separated as to their order of finish, a dead heat shall, with the approval of the stewards, be declared.
(2) In the event one or more of the first four finishers of a race are involved in a dead heat, the placing judges shall post the dead heat sign on the totalizator board and cause the numbers of the horse or horses involved to blink on the totalizator board.
10.4(11) Jockey room custodian.
The jockey room custodian shall: a.
Supervise the conduct of the jockeys and their attendants while they are in the jockey room; b. Keep the jockey room clean and safe for all jockeys; c. Ensure all jockeys are in the correct colors before leaving the jockey room to prepare for mounting their horses; d. Keep a daily film list as dictated by the stewards and have it displayed in plain view for all jockeys; e. Keep a daily program displayed in plain view for the jockeys; f. Keep unauthorized persons out of the jockey room; g. Report to the stewards any unusual occurrences in the jockey room; h. Assist the clerk of scales as required; i. Supervise the care and storage of racing colors; and j. Assign to each jockey a locker for the use of storing the jockey's clothing, equipment, and personal effects.
10.4(12) Mutuel manager.
The mutuel manager is responsible for the operation of the mutuel department.
The mutuel manager shall ensure that any delays in the running of official races caused by totalizator malfunctions are reported to the stewards.
The mutuel manager shall submit a written report on any delay when requested by the state steward.
10.4(13) Clerk of scales.
The clerk of scales shall: a.
When any horse places first, second, or third in a race, or is coupled in any form of multiple exotic wagering, and thereafter the horse's jockey is weighed in short by more than two pounds of the weight of which the jockey was weighed out, the mount may be disqualified and all purse moneys forfeited
; d. Oversee the security of the jockey room including the conduct of the jockeys and their attendants; e. Record all required data on the scale sheet and submit that data to the horsemen's bookkeeper at the end of each race day; f. Maintain the record of applicable winning races on all apprentice certificates at the meeting; g. Release apprentice jockey certificates, upon the jockey's departure or upon the conclusion of the race meet; and h. Assume the duties of the jockey room custodian in the absence of such employee.
.4(14) Outrider. a.
The facility shall appoint a minimum of two outriders on the main track for each race of a performance and during workouts.
The facility shall appoint one outrider on the training track during all workouts.
The outriders must be neat in appearance, wear approved helmets with the 16 chin straps securely fastened, and wear approved safety vests while on the main track or training track.
b.
The outriders shall: (1) Accompany the field of horses from the paddock to the post; (2) Ensure the post parade is conducted in an orderly manner, with all jockeys and pony riders conducting themselves in a manner in conformity with the best interests of racing as determined by the board of stewards; (3) Assist jockeys with unruly horses; (4) Render assistance when requested by a jockey; (5) Be present during morning workouts to assist exercise riders as required by regulations; (6) Promptly report to the stewards any unusual conduct which occurs while performing the duties of an outrider; (7) Ensure individuals using the track(s) are appropriately licensed; and (8) Promptly report jockey objections to the stewards after the finish of each race.
10.4(15) Horsemen's bookkeeper. a.
General authority.
The horsemen's bookkeeper shall maintain the records and accounts and perform the duties described herein and maintain such other records and accounts and perform such other duties as the facility and commission may prescribe.
b. Records.
(1) The records shall include the name, mailing address, social security number or federal tax identification number, and the state or country of residence of each horse owner, trainer, or jockey participating at the race meeting who has funds due or on deposit in the horsemen's account.
(2) The records shall include a file of all required statements of partnerships, syndicates, corporations, assignments of interest, lease agreements, and registrations of authorized agents.
(3) All records of the horsemen's bookkeeper shall be kept separate and apart from the records of the facility.
(4) All records of the horsemen's bookkeeper including records of accounts and moneys and funds kept on deposit are subject to inspection by the commission at any time. c. Moneys and funds on account.
(1) All moneys and funds on account with the horsemen's bookkeeper shall be maintained: 1.
Separate and apart from moneys and funds of the facility; 2.
In a trust account designated as "horsemen's trust account"; and 3.
In an account insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or the Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corporation.
(2) The horsemen's bookkeeper shall be bonded. d. Payment of purses.
(1) The horsemen's bookkeeper shall receive, maintain, and disburse the purses of each race and all stakes, entrance money, jockey fees, purchase money in claiming races, all applicable taxes, and other moneys that properly come into the horsemen's bookkeeper's possession in accordance with the provisions of commission rules.
(2) The horsemen's bookkeeper may accept moneys due, belonging to other organizations or recognized meetings, provided prompt return is made to the organization to which the money is due.
17 (3) The horsemen's bookkeeper shall disburse the purse of each race and all stakes, entrance money, jockey fees, purchase money in claiming races, and all applicable taxes, upon request, within 48 hours of receipt of notification that all tests with respect to such races have cleared the drug testing laboratory (commission chemist) as reported by the stewards.
Minimum jockey mount fees may be disbursed prior to notification that the tests have cleared the testing laboratory.
(4) Absent a prior request, the horsemen's bookkeeper shall disburse moneys to the persons entitled to receive same within 15 days after the last race day of the race meeting, including purses for official races, provided that all tests with respect to such races have cleared the drug testing laboratory as reported by the stewards, and provided further that no protest or appeal has been filed with the stewards or the commission.
(5) In the event a protest or appeal has been filed with the stewards or the commission, the horsemen's bookkeeper shall disburse the purse within 48 hours of receipt of dismissal or a final nonappealable order disposing of such protest or appeal.
e.
No portion of purse money other than jockey fees shall be deducted by the facility for itself or for another, unless so requested in writing by the person to whom purse moneys are payable or the person's duly authorized representative.
The horsemen's bookkeeper shall mail to each owner a duplicate of each record of all deposits, withdrawals, or transfers of funds affecting the owner's racing account at the close of each race meeting.
10.4(16) Patrol judges.
a.
General authority.
A facility may employ patrol judges who shall observe the running of the race and report information concerning the running of the race to the stewards. b. Duty stations.
Each patrol judge shall have a duty station assigned by the stewards.
10.4(17) Commission veterinarians.
a.
The veterinarians shall advise the commission and the stewards on all veterinary matters.
b.
The commission veterinarians shall have supervision and control of the detention barn for the collection of test samples for the testing of horses for prohibited medication as provided in Iowa Code sections 99D.23(2) and 99D.25(9).
The commission may employ persons to assist the commission veterinarians in maintaining the detention barn area and collecting test samples.
c.
The commission veterinarians shall not buy or sell any horse under their supervision; wager on a race under their supervision; or be licensed to participate in racing in any other capacity.
d.
The stewards or commission veterinarians may request any horse entered in a race to undergo an examination on the day of the race to determine the general fitness of the horse for racing.
During the examination, all bandages shall be removed by the groom upon request and the horse may be exercised outside the stall to permit the examiner to determine the condition of the horse's legs and feet.
The examining veterinarian shall report any unsoundness in a horse to the stewards. e.
A commission veterinarian shall inspect all of the horses in a race at the starting gate and after the finish of a race shall observe the horses upon their leaving the track.
f.
The commission veterinarian shall place any horse determined to be sick or too unsafe, unsound, or unfit to race on a veterinarian's list that shall be posted in a conspicuous place available to all owners, trainers, and officials.
g.
A horse placed on the veterinarian's list, bleeders exempt, may be allowed to enter only after it has been removed from the list by the commission veterinarian.
Requests for the removal of 18 any horse from the veterinarian's list will be accepted only after three calendar days from the placing of the horse on the veterinarian's list have elapsed.
Removal from the list will be at the discretion of the commission veterinarian who may require satisfactory workouts or examinations to adequately demonstrate that the problem that caused the horse to be placed on the list has been rectified. h.
The commission veterinarians shall supervise and ensure that the administration of lasix and phenylbutazone is in compliance with Iowa Code section 99D.25A. i.
The commission veterinarians shall, in accordance with Iowa Code section 99D.25A, be present at all postmortem examinations on all horses which have expired or been euthanized on facility grounds.
j.
The commission veterinarian or commission representative shall take receipt of veterinary reports as required by Iowa Code section 99D.25(10).
491--10.5(99D) Trainer, jockey, and jockey agent responsibilities.
10.5(1) Trainer. a.
Responsibility.
The trainer is responsible for: (1) The condition of horses entered in an official workout or race and, in the absence of substantial evidence to the contrary, for the presence of any prohibited drug, medication or other substance, including permitted medication in excess of the maximum allowable level, in such horses, regardless of the acts of third parties.
A positive test for a prohibited drug, medication, or substance, including permitted medication in excess of the maximum allowable level, as reported by a commission-approved laboratory, is prima facie evidence of a violation of this rule or Iowa Code chapter 99D.
(2) Preventing the administration of any drug, medication, or other prohibited substance that may cause a violation of these rules.
(3) Any violation of rules regarding a claimed horse's participation in the race in which the trainer's horse is claimed.
(4) The condition and contents of stalls, tack rooms, feed rooms, sleeping rooms, and other areas which have been assigned to the trainer by the facility and maintaining the assigned stable area in a clean, neat, and sanitary condition at all times.
(5) Ensuring that fire prevention rules are strictly observed in the assigned stable area.
(6) Providing a list to the commission of the trainer's employees in any area under the jurisdiction of the commission.
The list shall include each employee's name, occupation, social security number, and occupational license number.
The commission shall be notified by the trainer, in writing, within 24 hours of any change.
(7) The proper identity, custody, care, health, condition, and safety of horses in the trainer's charge.
(8) Disclosure to the racing secretary of the true and entire ownership of each horse in the trainer's care, custody, or control.
Any change in ownership shall be reported immediately to, and approved by, the stewards and recorded by the racing secretary.
The disclosure, together with all written agreements and affidavits setting out oral agreements pertaining to the ownership for or rights in and to a horse, shall be attached to the registration certificate for the horse and filed with the racing secretary.
(9) Training all horses owned wholly or in part by the trainer which are participating at the race 19 meeting.
(10) Registering with the racing secretary each horse in the trainer's charge within 24 hours of the horse's arrival on facility grounds.
(11) Ensuring that, at the time of arrival at the facility, each horse in the trainer's care is accompanied by a valid health certificate which shall be filed with the racing secretary.
(12) Having each horse in the trainer's care that is racing or stabled on facility grounds tested for equine infectious anemia (EIA) in accordance with state law and for filing evidence of such negative test results with the racing secretary.
The test must have been conducted within the previous 12 months and must be repeated upon expiration.
The certificate must be attached to the foal certificate.
(13) Using the services of those veterinarians licensed by the commission to attend horses that are on facility grounds.
(14) Immediately reporting the alteration of the sex of a horse in the trainer's care to the horse identifier and the racing secretary.
(15) Promptly reporting to the racing secretary and the commission veterinarian any horse on which a posterior digital neurectomy (heel nerving) has been performed and ensuring that such fact is designated on its certificate of registration.
See Iowa Code subsections 99D.25(1) to 99D.25(3).
(16) Promptly reporting to the stewards and the commission veterinarian the serious illness of any horse in the trainer's charge.
(17) Promptly reporting the death of any horse in the trainer's care on facility grounds to the stewards, owner, and the commission veterinarian and complying with Iowa Code subsection 99D.25(5) governing postmortem examination.
(18) Maintaining a knowledge of the medication record and status of all horses in the trainer's care.
(19) Immediately reporting to the stewards and the commission veterinarian if the trainer knows, or has cause to believe, that a horse in the trainer's custody, care, or control has received any prohibited drugs or medication.
(20) Representing an owner in making entries and scratches and in all other matters pertaining to racing.
(21) Eligibility of horses entered and weight or other allowance claimed.
(22) Ensuring the fitness of a horse to perform creditably at the distance entered.
(23) Ensuring that the trainer's horses are properly shod, bandaged, and equipped.
(24) Presenting the trainer's horse in the paddock at least 20 minutes before post time or at a time otherwise appointed before the race in which the horse is entered.
(25) Personally attending to the trainer's horses in the paddock and supervising the saddling thereof, unless excused by the stewards.
(26) Instructing the jockey to give the jockey's best effort during a race and instructing the jockey that each horse shall be ridden to win.
(27) Witnessing the collection of a urine or blood sample from the horse in the trainer's charge or delegating a licensed employee or the owner of the horse to do so.
(28) Notifying horse owners upon the revocation or suspension of the trainer's license.
Upon application by the owner, the stewards may approve the transfer of such horses to the care of another licensed trainer and, upon such approved transfer, such horses may be entered to race.
20 b. Restrictions on wagering.
A trainer with a horse(s) entered in a race shall be allowed to wager only on that horse(s) or that horse(s) in combination with other horses.
c. Assistant trainers.
(1) Upon the demonstration of a valid need, a trainer may employ an assistant trainer as approved by the stewards.
The assistant trainer shall be licensed prior to acting in such capacity on behalf of the trainer.
(2) Qualifications for obtaining an assistant trainer's license shall be prescribed by the stewards and the commission and may include requirements set forth in 491--Chapter 6.
(3) An assistant trainer may substitute for and shall assume the same duties, responsibilities and restrictions as are imposed on the licensed trainer, in which case the trainer shall be jointly responsible for the assistant trainer's compliance with the rules.
d. Substitute trainers.
(1) A trainer absent for more than five days from responsibility as a licensed trainer, or on a day in which the trainer has a horse in a race, shall obtain another licensed trainer to substitute.
(2) A substitute trainer shall accept responsibility for the horses in writing and shall be approved by the stewards.
(3) A substitute trainer and the absent trainer shall be jointly responsible as absolute insurers of the condition of their horses entered in an official workout or race.
10.5(2) Jockey. a.
Responsibility.
(1) A jockey shall give a best effort during a race, and each horse shall be ridden to win.
(2) A jockey shall not have a valet attendant except one provided and compensated by the facility.
(3) No person other than the licensed contract employer or a licensed jockey agent may make riding engagements for a rider, except that a jockey not represented by a jockey agent may make the jockey's own riding engagements.
(4) A jockey shall have no more than one jockey agent.
(5) No revocation of a jockey agent's authority is effective until the jockey notifies the stewards in writing of the revocation of the jockey agent's authority.
(6) A jockey shall promptly report objections to the outrider(s) following the finish of the race. b. Jockey betting.
A jockey shall be allowed to wager only on a race in which the jockey is riding.
A jockey shall be allowed to wager only if: (1) The owner or trainer of the horse that the jockey is riding makes the wager for the jockey; (2) The jockey only wagers on the jockey's own mount to win or finish first in combination with other horses in multiple-type wagers; and (3) Records of such wagers are kept and available for presentation upon request by the stewards. c. Jockey's spouse.
A jockey shall not compete in any race against a horse that is trained or owned by the jockey's spouse.
d. Jockey mount fees.
In the absence of a specific contract or special agreement, the following jockey mount fees apply: Purse Winning Mount 2nd Place 3rd Place Unplaced $599 and under $33 $33 $33 $33 $600 to $699 36 33 33 33 21 $700 to $1,499 10% Win Purse 33 33 33 $1,500 to $1,999 10% Win Purse 35 33 33 $2,000 to $3,499 10% Win Purse 45 40 38 $3,500 to $4,999 10% Win Purse 55 45 40 $5,000 to $9,999 10% Win Purse 65 50 45 $10,000 to $14,999 10% Win Purse 5% Place Purse 5% Show Purse 50 $15,000 to $24,999 10% Win Purse 5% Place Purse 5% Show Purse 55 $25,000 to $49,999 10% Win Purse 5% Place Purse 5% Show Purse 65 $50,000 to $99,999 10% Win Purse 5% Place Purse 5% Show Purse 80 $100,000 and up 10% Win Purse 5% Place Purse 5% Show Purse 105 e. Entitlement.
Any apprentice or contract rider shall be entitled to the regular jockey fees, except when riding a horse owned in part or solely by the contract holder.
An interest in the winnings only (such as trainer's percent) shall not constitute ownership.
f. Fee earned.
A jockey's fee shall be considered earned when the jockey is weighed out by the clerk of scales.
The fee shall not be considered earned when injury to the horse or rider is not involved and jockeys, of their own free will, take themselves off their mounts.
Any conditions or considerations not covered by the above shall be at the discretion of the stewards. g. Multiple engagements.
If any owner or trainer engages two or more jockeys for the same race, the owner or trainer shall be required to pay each of the jockeys the appropriate fee whether the jockeys ride in the race or not. h. Dead heats.
Jockeys finishing a race in a dead heat shall divide equally the totals they individually would have received had one jockey won the race alone.
The owners of the horses finishing in the dead heat shall pay equal shares of the jockey fees. i. Apprentices subject to jockey rules.
Unless excepted under these rules, apprentices are subject to all rules governing jockeys and racing.
j. Conduct.
(1) Clothing and appearance.
A jockey shall wear the colors furnished by the owner or facility with the number on the saddlecloth corresponding to the number given in the racing program.
A jockey shall maintain a neat and clean appearance while engaged in duties on facility grounds and shall wear a clean jockey costume, cap, helmet (approved by commission), a jacket of silk or waterproof fabric, breeches, and top boots.
(2) Competing against contractor.
No jockey may ride in any race against a starting horse belonging to the jockey's contract employer unless the jockey's mount and the contract employer's horse are both trained by the same trainer.
(3) Confined to jockey room.
Jockeys engaged to ride a race shall report to the jockey room on the day of the race at the time designated by facility officials.
The jockeys shall then report their engagements and any overweight to the clerk of scales.
Thereafter, they shall not leave the jockey room, except by permission of the stewards, until all of their riding engagements of the day have been fulfilled.
Once jockeys have fulfilled their riding engagements for the day and have left the jockeys' quarters, they shall not be readmitted to the jockeys' quarters until after the entire racing program for that day has been completed, except upon permission of the stewards.
Jockeys are not allowed to communicate with anyone but the trainer while in the room during the performance except with approval of the stewards.
On these occasions, they shall be accompanied by a security guard.
(4) Whip prohibited.
Jockeys may not use a whip on a two-year-old horse before April 1 of each year, nor shall a jockey or other person engage in excessive or indiscriminate whipping of any horse at any time.
(5) Spurs prohibited.
Jockeys shall not use spurs.
(6) Possessing drugs or devices.
Jockeys shall not have in their care, control, or custody any drugs, prohibited substances, or electrical or mechanical device that could affect a horse's racing performance.
k. Jockey effort.
A jockey shall exert every effort to ride the horse to the finish in the best and fastest run of which the horse is capable.
No jockey shall ease up or coast to a finish, without adequate cause, even if the horse has no apparent chance to win prize money.
l.
Duty to fulfill engagements.
Jockeys shall fulfill their duly scheduled riding engagements, unless excused by the stewards.
Jockeys shall not be forced to ride a horse they believe to be unsound or over a racing strip they believe to be unsafe.
If the stewards find a jockey's refusal to fulfill a riding engagement is based on personal belief unwarranted by the facts and circumstances, the jockey may be subject to disciplinary action.
Jockeys shall be responsible to their agent for any engagements previously secured by the agent.
m. Riding interference.
(1) When the way is clear in a race, a horse may be ridden to any part of the course; but if any horse swerves, or is ridden to either side, so as to interfere with, impede, or intimidate any other horse, it is a foul.
(2) The offending horse may be disqualified if, in the opinion of the stewards, the foul altered the finish of the race, regardless of whether the foul was accidental, willful, or the result of careless riding.
(3) If the stewards determine the foul was intentional, or due to careless riding, the jockey shall be held responsible.
(4) In a straightaway race, every horse must maintain position as nearly as possible in the lane in which it started.
If a horse is ridden, drifts, or swerves out of its lane in such a manner that it interferes with, impedes, or intimidates another horse, it is a foul and may result in the disqualification of the offending horse.
n. Jostling.
Jockeys shall not jostle another horse or jockey.
Jockeys shall not strike another horse or jockey or ride so carelessly as to cause injury or possible injury to another horse in the race. o. Partial fault/third-party interference.
If a horse or jockey interferes with or jostles another horse, the aggressor may be disqualified, unless the interfered or jostled horse or jockey was partly at fault or the infraction was wholly caused by the fault of some other horse or jockey. p. Careless riding.
A jockey shall not ride carelessly or willfully permit the mount to interfere with, intimidate, or impede any other horse in the race.
A jockey shall not strike at another horse or jockey so as to impede, interfere with, or injure the other horse or jockey.
If a jockey rides in a manner contrary to this rule, the horse may be disqualified; or the jockey may be fined, suspended, or otherwise disciplined; or other penalties may apply.
q. Jockey weighed out.
(1)
Jockeys must be weighed for their assigned horse not more than 30 minutes before the time fixed for the race.
(2) A jockey's weight shall include the jockey's clothing, boots, saddle and its attachments.
A 23 safety vest shall be mandatory, shall weigh no more than two pounds, and shall be designed to provide shock-absorbing protection to the upper body of at least a rating of five as defined by the British Equestrian Trade Association.
(3) All other equipment shall be excluded from the weight.
r. Overweight limited.
No jockey may weigh more than two pounds or, in the case of inclement weather, four pounds over the weight the horse is assigned to carry unless with consent of the owner or trainer and unless the jockey has declared the amount of overweight to the clerk of scales at least 45 minutes before the time of the race.
However, a horse shall not carry more than seven pounds overweight, except in inclement weather when nine pounds shall be allowed.
The overweight shall be publicly announced and posted in a conspicuous place both prior to the first race of the day and before the running of the race.
(1) Weigh in.
Upon completion of a race, jockeys shall ride promptly to the winner's circle and dismount.
Jockeys riding the first four finishers, or at the discretion of the stewards a greater number, shall present themselves to the clerk of scales to be weighed in.
If a jockey is prevented from riding the mount to the winner's circle because of accident or illness either to the jockey or the horse, the jockey may walk or be carried to the scales unless excused by the stewards.
(2) Unsaddling.
Jockeys, upon completion of a race, must return to the unsaddling area and unsaddle their own horse, unless excused by the stewards.
(3) Removing horse's equipment.
No person except the valet attendant for each mount is permitted to assist the jockey in removing the horse's equipment that is included in the jockey's weight, unless the stewards permit otherwise.
To weigh in, jockeys shall carry to the scales all pieces of equipment with which they weighed out.
Thereafter they may hand the equipment to the valet attendant.
(4) Underweight.
When any horse places first, second, or third in a race, or is coupled in any form of multiple exotic wagering, and thereafter the horse's jockey is weighed in short by more than two pounds of the weight of which the jockey was weighed out, the mount may be disqualified and all purse moneys forfeited
.
(5)
Overweight.
If the jockey is overweight, the jockey is subject to fine, suspension, or both
. s. Contracts.
Rescinded 6/20/2001. t. Jockey fines and forfeitures.
Jockeys shall pay any fine or forfeiture from their own funds within 48 hours of the imposition of the fine or at a time deemed proper by the stewards.
No other person shall pay jockey fines or forfeitures for the jockey. u. Competing claims.
Whenever two or more licensees claim the services of one jockey for a race, first call shall have priority and any dispute shall be resolved by the stewards. v. Jockey suspension.
(1) Offenses involving fraud.
Suspension of a licensee for an offense involving fraud or deception in racing shall begin immediately after the ruling unless otherwise ordered by the stewards or commission.
(2) Offenses not involving fraud.
Suspension for an offense not involving fraud or deception in racing shall begin on the third day after the ruling or at the stewards' discretion.
(3) Withdrawal of appeal.
Withdrawal by the appellant of a notice of appeal filed with the commission, whenever imposition of the disciplinary action has been stayed or enjoined pending a final decision by the commission, shall be deemed a frivolous appeal and referred to the commission for further disciplinary action in the event the appellant fails to show good cause to 24 the stewards why the withdrawal should not be deemed frivolous.
(4) Riding suspensions of ten days or less and participating in designated races.
The stewards appointed for a race meeting shall immediately, prior to the commencement of that meeting, designate the stakes, futurities, futurity trials, or other races in which a jockey will be permitted to compete, notwithstanding the fact that such jockey is technically under suspension for ten days or less for a riding infraction at the time the designated race is to be run.
1.
Official rulings for riding suspensions of ten days or less shall state: "The term of this suspension shall not prohibit participation in designated races."
2.
A listing of the designated races shall be posted in the jockey room and any other such location deemed appropriate by the stewards.
3.
A suspended jockey must be named at time of entry to participate in any designated race.
4.
A day in which a jockey participated in one designated race while on suspension shall count as a suspension day.
Designated trials for a stake shall be considered one race.
10.5(3) Jockey agent.
a.
Responsibilities.
(1) A jockey agent shall not make or assist in making engagements for a jockey other than the jockeys the agent is licensed to represent.
(2) A jockey agent shall file written proof of all agencies and changes of agencies with the stewards.
(3) A jockey agent shall notify the stewards, in writing, prior to withdrawing from representation of a jockey and shall submit to the stewards a list of any unfulfilled engagements made for the jockey.
(4) All persons permitted to make riding engagements shall maintain current and accurate records of all engagements made.
Such records shall be subject to examination by the stewards at any time.
(5) A jockey agent may represent an apprentice jockey and two journeymen jockeys or three journeymen jockeys at a "mixed" meet.
However, at the "mixed" meeting two, at most, may ride the same breed.
b. Prohibited areas.
A jockey agent is prohibited from entering the jockey room, winner's circle, racing strip, paddock, or saddling enclosure during the hours of racing, unless permitted by the stewards. c.
A jockey agent shall not be permitted to withdraw from the representation of any jockey unless written notice to the stewards has been provided.
491--10.6(99D) Conduct of races.
10.6(1) Horses ineligible.
Any horse ineligible to be entered for a race, or ineligible to start in any race, which competes in that race may be disqualified and the stewards may discipline the persons responsible for the horse competing in that race. a.
A horse is ineligible to enter a race when: (1) The nominator has failed to identify the horse which is being entered for the first time, by name, color, sex, age, and the names of sire and dam as registered.
(2) A horse has been knowingly entered or raced in any jurisdiction under a different name, with an altered registration certificate, or altered lip tattoo by a person having lawful custody or control of the horse for the purpose of deceiving any facility or regulatory agency.
25 (3) A horse has been allowed to enter or start by a person having lawful custody or control of the horse who participated in or assisted in the entry or racing of some other horse under the name of the horse in question.
(4) A horse is wholly or partially owned by a disqualified person or a horse is under the direct or indirect management of a disqualified person.
(5) A horse is wholly or partially owned by the spouse of a disqualified person or a horse is under the direct or indirect management of the spouse of a disqualified person.
In such cases, a presumption which may be rebutted is that the disqualified person and spouse constitute a single financial entity with respect to the horse.
(6) A horse is owned in whole or in part by an undisclosed person or interest.
(7) A horse has been nerved by surgical neurectomy.
(8) A horse has been trachea-tubed to artificially assist breathing.
(9) A horse has impaired eyesight in both eyes.
(10) A horse appears on the starter's list, stewards' list, paddock list, or veterinarian's list, notwithstanding a horse appearing on the veterinarian's list as a "bleeder."
(11) A horse is barred from racing in any racing jurisdiction.
b.
A horse is ineligible to start a race when: (1) The horse is not stabled on the grounds of the facility by the time designated by the stewards.
(2) The horse's breed registration certificate is not on file with the racing secretary, or horse identifier, except in the case of a quarter horse where the racing secretary has submitted the certificate to the breed registry for correction.
The stewards may, in their discretion, waive the requirement in nonclaiming races provided the horse is otherwise properly identified.
(3) The horse is not fully identified by an official tattoo on the inside of the upper lip.
(4) A horse is brought to the paddock and is not in the care of and saddled by a currently licensed trainer or assistant trainer.
(5) No current negative Coggins test or current negative equine infectious anemia test certificate is attached to the horse's registration certificate.
(6) The stakes or entrance money for the horse has not been paid.
(7) The horse appears on the starter's list, stewards' list, paddock list, or veterinarian's list.
(8) The horse is a first-time starter not approved by the starter and does not have a minimum of two published workouts.
(9) Within the past calendar year, the horse has started in a race that has not been reported in a nationally published monthly chartbook, unless, at least 48 hours prior to entry, the owner of the horse provides to the racing secretary performance records which show the place and date of the race, distance, weight carried, amount carried, and the horse's finishing position and time.
(10) In a stakes race, a horse has been transferred with its engagements, unless prior to the start, the fact of transfer of the horse and its engagements has been filed with the racing secretary.
(11) A horse is subject to a lien which has not been approved by the stewards and filed with the horsemen's bookkeeper.
(12) A horse is subject to a lease not filed with the stewards.
(13) A horse is not in sound racing condition.
(14) A horse has been blocked with alcohol or injected with any other foreign substance or drug to desensitize the nerves of the leg.
26 (15) A horse appears on the veterinarian's list as a "bleeder."
10.6(2) Entries. a.
The facility shall provide forms for making entries and declarations with the racing secretary.
Entries and declarations shall be in writing, or by telephone or fax subsequently confirmed in writing by the owner, trainer, or authorized agent.
When any entrant or nominator claims failure or error in the receipt by a facility of any entry or declaration, the entrant or nominator may be required to submit evidence within a reasonable time of the filing of the entry or the declaration.
b. Upon the closing of entries the racing secretary shall promptly compile a list of entries and cause it to be conspicuously posted.
c. Coupling.
(1) Entry coupling.
When one owner or lessee enters more than one horse in the same race, the horses shall be coupled as an entry.
Horses shall be regarded as having a common owner when an owner of one horse, either as an individual, a licensed member of a partnership, or a licensed shareholder of a corporation has an aggregate commonality of ownership of 5 percent interest in another horse, either as an individual, a licensed member of a partnership, or a licensed shareholder of a corporation.
(2) Coupled entry limitations on owner.
No more than two horses coupled by a common ownership or trainer shall be entered in an overnight race.
(3) Coupling of entries by stewards.
The stewards may couple as a single entry any horses which, in the determination of the stewards, are connected by common ownership, common lessee, the same trainer, or when the stewards determine that coupling is necessary in the interest of the regulation of the pari-mutuel wagering industry or is necessary to ensure the public's confidence in racing.
(4) Exclusion of single interest.
Horses having the same owner, lessee, or trainer shall not be permitted to enter or start if the effect would deprive a single interest from starting in overnight races.
d. Splitting of a race.
If a race is canceled and declared off for insufficient entries, the facility may split the list of entries for any other overnight race to provide an additional race to replace the one canceled.
The racing secretary shall by lot divide the entries of the race so split into two different races.
e. Entry weight.
Owners, trainers, or any other duly authorized person who enters a horse for a race shall ensure that the entry is correct and accurate as to the weight allowances available and claimed for the horse under the conditions set for the race.
After a horse is entered and has been assigned a weight to carry in the race, the assignment of weight shall not be changed except in the case of error and with the approval of the stewards.
Weight allowances may be waived with the approval of the stewards. f. Horses run once daily.
No horse shall be entered for more than one race on the same day on which pari-mutuel wagering is conducted.
g. Foreign entries.
For the purposes of determining eligibility, weight assignments, or allowances for horses imported from a foreign nation, the racing secretary shall take into account the "Pattern Race Book" published jointly by the Irish Turf Club, The Jockey Club of Great Britain, and the Socit d'Encouragement. h. Weight conversions.
For the purpose of determining eligibility, weight assignments, or allowances for horses imported from a foreign nation, the racing secretary shall convert metric 27 distances to English measures by reference to the following scale: 1 sixteenth = 100 meters 1 furlong = 200 meters 1 mile = 1600 meters i. Name.
The "name" of a horse means the name reflected on the certificate of registration, racing permit, or temporary racing permit issued by the breed registry.
Imported horses shall have a suffix, enclosed by brackets, added to their registered names showing the country of foaling.
This suffix is derived from the international code of suffixes and constitutes part of the horse's registered name.
The registered names and suffixes, where applicable, shall be printed in the official program.
j. Bona fide entry.
No person shall enter or attempt to enter a horse for a race unless that entry is a bona fide entry, made with the intention that the horse is to compete in the race for which the horse was entered.
k. Registration certificate to reflect correct ownership.
Every breed registry foal certificate filed with the racing secretary to establish the eligibility of a horse to be entered for any race shall accurately reflect the correct and true ownership of the horse.
The name of the owner that is printed on the official program for the horse shall conform to the ownership as declared on the certificate of registration or eligibility certificate unless a stable name has been registered with the commission for the owner or ownership.
10.6(3) Sweepstakes entries.
a.
Entry and withdrawal.
The entry of a horse in a sweepstakes is a subscription to the sweepstakes.
Before the time of closing, any entry or subscription may be altered or withdrawn.
b. Entrance money.
Entrance money shall be paid by the nominator to a race.
In the event of the death of the horse or a mistake made in the entry of an otherwise eligible horse, the nominator subscriber shall continue to be obligated for any stakes, and the entrance money shall not be returned.
c. Quarter horse scratches and qualifiers unable to participate in finals.
If a horse should be scratched from the time trial finals, the horse's owner will not be eligible for a refund of the fees paid.
If a horse that qualified for the final should be unable to enter due to racing soundness, or scratched for any reason other than a positive drug test report or a rule violation, the horse shall be deemed to have earned and the owner will receive last place money.
If more than one horse should be unable to enter due to racing soundness, or scratched for any reason other than a positive drug test report or a rule violation, then those purse moneys shall be added together and divided equally among the horse owners.
10.6(4) Closing of entries.
a.
Overnight entries.
Entries for overnight racing shall be closed at 10 a.m. by the racing secretary, unless a later closing is established by the racing secretary or unless approved by the stewards. b. Sweepstakes entries.
If an hour for closing is designated, entries and declarations for sweepstakes cannot be received thereafter.
However, if a time for closing is not designated, entries and declarations may be mailed or faxed until midnight of the day of closing, if they are received in time to comply with all other conditions of the race.
In the absence of notice to the contrary, entries and declarations for sweepstakes that close during or on the day preceding a race meeting shall close at the office of the racing secretary in accordance with any requirements the 28 secretary shall make.
Closing for sweepstakes not during race meetings shall be at the office of the facility.
c. Exception.
Nominations for stakes races shall not close nor shall any eligibility payment be due on a day in which the United States Postal Service is not operating.
10.6(5) Prohibited entries.
a.
Entry by disqualified person.
An entry made by a disqualified person or the entry of a disqualified horse shall be void.
Any money paid for the entry shall be returned, if the disqualification is disclosed at least 45 minutes before post time for the race.
Otherwise, the entry money shall be paid to the winner.
b. Limited partner entry prohibited.
No person other than a managing partner of a limited partnership or a person authorized by the managing partner may enter a horse owned by that partnership.
c. Altering entries prohibited.
No alteration shall be made in any entry after the closing of entries, but the stewards may permit the correction of an error in an entry.
d. Limitation on overnight entries.
If the number of entries to any purse or overnight race is in excess of the number of horses that may be accommodated due to the size of the track, the starters for the race and their post positions shall be determined by lot conducted in public by the racing secretary.
e. Stake race entry limit.
In a stake race, the number of horses which may compete shall be limited only by the number of horses nominated and entered.
In any case, the facility's lawful race conditions shall govern.
f. Stewards' denial of entry.
The stewards may, after notice to the entrant, subscriber, or nominator, deny entry of any horse to a race if the stewards determine the entry to be in violation of these rules or the laws of this state or to be contrary to the interests of the commission in the regulation of pari-mutuel wagering or to public confidence in racing.
10.6(6) Preferences and eligibles. a.
Also eligible.
A list of not more than eight names may be drawn from entries filed in excess of positions available in the race.
These names shall be listed as "also eligible" to be used as entries if originally entered horses are withdrawn.
Any owner, trainer, or authorized agent who has entered a horse listed as an "also eligible" and who does not wish to start shall file a scratch card with the secretary not later than the scratch time designated for that race.
"Also eligibles" shall have preference to scratch.
b. Preference system.
A system using dates or stars shall be used to determine preference for horses being entered in races.
The system being used will be at the option of the racing secretary and approved by the stewards.
A preference list will be kept current by the racing secretary and made available to horsemen upon request.
c. Disputed decision.
When the decision of a race is in dispute, all horses involved in the dispute, with respect to the winner's credit or earnings, shall be liable to all weights or conditions attached to the winning of that race until a winner has been finally adjudged.
10.6(7) Post positions.
Post positions shall be determined by the racing secretary publicly and by lot.
Post positions shall be drawn from "also eligible" entries at scratch time.
In all races, horses drawn into the race from the "also eligible" list shall take the outside post positions, except in straightaway quarter horse racing.
In straightaway quarter horse racing, the post position of the scratched horse shall be assigned to the horse "drawing in."
In the event there is 29 more than one scratch, the post positions shall be assigned by lot.
10.6(8) Scratch; declaring out. a.
Notification to the secretary.
No horse shall be considered scratched, declared out, or withdrawn from a race until the owner, agent, or other authorized person has given notice in writing to the racing secretary before the time set by the facility as scratch time.
All scratches must be approved by the stewards. b. Declaration irrevocable.
Scratching or the declaration of a horse out of an engagement for a race is irrevocable.
c. Limitation on scratches.
No horse shall be permitted to be scratched from a race if the horses remaining in the race number fewer than ten, unless the stewards permit a lesser number.
When the number of requests to scratch would, if granted, leave a field of fewer than ten, the stewards shall determine by lot which entrants may be scratched and permitted to withdraw from the race. d. Scratch time.
Unless otherwise set by the stewards, scratch time shall be: (1) Stakes races.
Scratch time shall be at least 45 minutes before post time.
(2) Other races.
Scratch time shall be no later than 10 a.m. of the day of the race.
10.6(9) Workouts. a.
When required.
No horse shall be allowed to start unless the horse has raced in an official race or has an approved official timed workout satisfactory to the stewards.
A horse that has not started for a period of 60 days or more shall be ineligible to race until it has completed a published workout satisfactory to the stewards prior to the day of the race in which entered.
The workout must have occurred within the previous 30 days.
First-time starters must have at least two published workouts and be approved from the gate by the starter. b. Identification.
The timer or the stewards may require licensees to identify a horse in their care being worked.
The owner, trainer, or jockey may be required to identify the distance the horse is to be worked and the point on the track where the workout will start.
c. Information dissemination.
If the stewards approve the timed workout so as to permit the horse to run in a race, they shall make it mandatory that this information be furnished to the public in advance of the race including, but not limited to, the following means: (1) Announcement over the facility's public address system; (2) Transmission on the facility's message board; (3) Posting in designated conspicuous places in the racing enclosure; and (4) Exhibit on track TV monitors at certain intervals if the track has closed circuit TV.
If the workout is published prior to the race in either the Daily Racing Form or the track program, then it shall not be necessary to make the announcements set forth above.
d. Restrictions.
No horse shall be taken onto the track for training or a workout except during hours designated by the facility.
10.6(10) Equipment.
a.
Whip and bridle limitations.
Unless permitted by the stewards, no whip or substitute for a whip shall exceed one pound or 30 inches and no bridle shall exceed two pounds.
b. Equipment change.
No licensee may change the equipment used on a horse from that used in the horse's last race, unless with permission of the stewards.
No licensee may add blinkers to a horse's equipment or discontinue their use without the prior approval of the starter and the stewards.
In the paddock prior to a race, a horse's tongue may be tied down with clean bandages, 30 clean gauze, or with a tongue strap.
10.6(11) Racing numbers.
a.
Number display.
Each horse in a race shall carry a conspicuous saddle cloth number corresponding to the official number given that horse on the official program.
b. Coupled entries.
In the case of a coupled or other entry that includes more than one horse, each horse in the entry shall carry the same number, with a different distinguishing letter following the number.
As an example, two horses in the same entry shall be entered as 1 and 1-A. c. Field horses.
In a combined field of horses, each horse in the field shall carry a separate number.
10.6(12) Valuation of purse money.
Rescinded 6/20/2001.
10.6(13) Dead heats. a.
When two horses run a dead heat for first place, all purses or prizes to which first and second horses would have been entitled shall be divided equally between them; and this applies in dividing all purses or prizes whatever the number of horses running a dead heat and whatever places for which the dead heat is run. b.
In the event of a dead-heat finish for second place and thereafter, when an objection to the winner of the race is sustained, the horses in the dead heat shall be considered to have run a dead heat for first place.
c.
If a prize includes a cup, plate, or other indivisible prize, owners shall draw lots for the prize in the presence of at least two stewards.
10.6(14) The facility shall not make distribution of any purses until given clearance of chemical tests by the state steward.
10.6(15) Purse money presumption.
The fact that purse money has been distributed prior to the issuance of a laboratory report shall not be deemed a finding that no chemical substance has been administered, in violation of these rules, to the horse earning the purse money.
10.6(16) Equine infectious anemia (EIA) test. a.
Certificate required.
No horse shall be allowed to start or be stabled on the grounds of the facility unless a valid negative Coggins test or other laboratory-approved negative EIA test certificate is on file with the racing secretary.
b. Trainer responsibility.
In the event of claims, sales, or transfers, it shall be the responsibility of the new trainer to ascertain the validity of the certificate for the horse within 24 hours.
If the certificate is either unavailable or invalid, the previous trainer shall be responsible for any reasonable cost associated with obtaining a negative EIA laboratory certificate.
c. Positive test reports.
Whenever any owner or trainer is furnished a positive Coggins test or positive EIA test result, the horse shall be removed by the owner or trainer from facility grounds or approved farms within 24 hours of actual notice to the owner or trainer of the infection.
10.6(17) Race procedures.
a.
Full weight.
Each horse shall carry the full weight assigned for that race from the paddock to the starting point, and shall parade past the stewards' stand, unless excused by the stewards. b. Touching and dismounting prohibited.
After the horses enter the track, jockeys may not dismount or entrust their horse to the care of an attendant unless due to an accident occurring to the jockey, the horse, or the equipment, and then only with the prior consent of the starter.
31 During any delay during which a jockey is permitted to dismount, all other jockeys may dismount and their horses may be attended by others.
After the horses enter the track, only the hands of the jockey, the starter, the assistant starter, the commission veterinarian, an outrider on a lead pony, or persons approved by the stewards may touch the horse before the start of the race. c. Jockey injury.
If a jockey is seriously injured on the way to the post, the horse shall be returned to the paddock, a replacement jockey obtained, and both the injured jockey and the replacement jockey will be paid by the owner.
d. Twelve-minute parade limit.
After entering the track, all horses shall proceed to the starting post in not more than 12 minutes unless approved by the stewards.
After passing the stewards' stand in parade, the horses may break formation and proceed to the post in any manner.
Once at the post, the horses shall be started without unnecessary delay.
All horses must participate in the parade carrying their weight and equipment from the paddock to the starting post, and any horse failing to do so may be disqualified by the stewards.
No lead pony leading a horse in the parade shall obstruct the public's view of the horse being led except with permission of the stewards. e. Striking a horse prohibited.
In assisting the start of a race, no person other than the jockey, starter, assistant starter, or veterinarian shall strike a horse or use any other means to assist the start.
f. Loading of horses.
Horses will be loaded into the starting gate in numerical order or in any other fair and consistent manner determined by the starter and approved by the stewards. g. Delays prohibited.
No person shall obstruct or delay the movement of a horse to the starting post.
10.6(18) Claiming races.
a.
Eligibility.
(1) Registered to race or open claim.
No person may file a claim for any horse unless the person: 1.
Is a licensed owner at the meeting who either has foal paper(s) registered with the racing secretary's office or has started a horse at the meeting.
A temporary horse owner's license is not valid for claiming purposes; or 2.
Is a licensed authorized agent, authorized to claim for an owner eligible to claim; or 3.
Has a valid open claim certificate.
Any person not licensed as an owner, or a licensed authorized agent for the account of the same, or a licensed owner not having foal paper(s) registered with the racing secretary's office or who has not started a horse at the meeting may request an open claim certificate from the commission.
The person must submit a completed application for a prospective owner's license to the commission.
The applicant must have the name of the trainer licensed by the commission who will be responsible for the claimed horse.
A nonrefundable fee must accompany the application along with any financial information requested by the commission.
The names of the prospective owners shall be prominently displayed in the offices of the commission and the racing secretary.
The application will be processed by the commission; and when the open claim certificate is exercised, an owner's license will be issued.
(2) One stable claim.
No stable that consists of horses owned by more than one person and which has a single trainer may submit more than one claim in any race.
An authorized agent may submit only one claim in any race regardless of the number of owners represented.
b. Procedure for claiming.
To make a claim for a horse, an eligible person shall: 32 (1) Deposit to the person's account with the horsemen's bookkeeper the full claiming price and applicable taxes as established by the racing secretary's conditions.
(2) File in a locked claim box maintained for that purpose by the stewards the claim filled out completely in writing and with sufficient accuracy to identify the claim on forms provided by the facility at least ten minutes before the time of the race. c. Claim box.
(1) The claim box shall be approved by the commission and kept locked until ten minutes prior to the start of the race, when it shall be presented to the stewards or their representatives for opening and publication of the claims.
(2) The claim box shall also include a time clock which automatically stamps the time on the claim envelope prior to its being dropped in the box.
(3) No official of a facility shall give any information as to the filing of claims therein until after the race has been run. d. Claim irrevocable.
After a claim has been filed in the claim box, it shall not be withdrawn.
e. Multiple claims on single horses.
If more than one claim is filed on a horse, the successful claim shall be determined by lot conducted by the stewards or their representatives.
f. Successful claims; later races.
(1) Sale or transfer.
No successful claimant may sell or transfer a horse, except in a claiming race, for a period of 30 days from the date of claim.
(2) Eligibility price.
A horse that is declared the official winner in the race in which it is claimed may not start in a race in which the claiming price is less than the amount for which it was claimed.
After the first start back or 30 days, whichever occurs first, a horse may start for any claiming price.
A horse which is not the official winner in the race in which it is claimed may start for any claiming price.
This provision shall not apply to starter handicaps in which the weight to be carried is assigned by the handicapper.
No right, title, or interest for any claimed horse shall be sold or transferred except in a claiming race for a period of 30 days following the date of claiming.
The day claimed shall not count, but the following calendar day shall be the first day.
(3) Racing elsewhere.
A horse that was claimed under these rules may not participate at a race meeting other than that at which it was claimed until the end of the meeting, except with written permission of the stewards.
This limitation shall not apply to stakes races.
(4) Same management.
A claimed horse shall not remain in the same stable or under the control or management of its former owner.
(5) When a horse is claimed out of a claiming race, the horse's engagements are included.
g. Transfer after claim.
(1) Forms.
Upon a successful claim, the stewards shall issue in triplicate, upon forms approved by the commission, an authorization of transfer of the horse from the original owner to the claimant.
Copies of the transfer authorization shall be forwarded to and maintained by the commission, the stewards, and the racing secretary.
No claimed horse shall be delivered by the original owner to the successful claimant until authorized by the stewards.
Every horse claimed shall race for the account of the original owner, but title to the horse shall be transferred to the claimant from the time the horse becomes a starter.
The successful claimant shall become the owner of the horse at the time of starting, regardless of whether it is alive or dead, sound or unsound, or injured during the race or after it.
The original trainer of the claimed horse shall be 33 responsible for the postrace test results.
(2) Other jurisdiction rules.
The commission will recognize and be governed by the rules of any other jurisdiction regulating title and claiming races when ownership of a horse is transferred or affected by a claiming race conducted in that other jurisdiction.
(3) Determination of sex and age.
The claimant shall be responsible for determining the age and sex of the horse claimed notwithstanding any designation of sex and age appearing in the program or in any racing publication.
In the event of a spayed mare, the (s) for spayed should appear next to the mare's name on the program.
If it does not and the claimant finds that the mare is in fact spayed, claimant may then return the mare for full refund of the claiming price.
(4) Affidavit by claimant.
The stewards may, if they determine it necessary, require any claimant to execute a sworn statement that the claimant is claiming the horse for the claimant's own account or as an authorized agent for a principal and not for any other person.
(5) Delivery required.
No person shall refuse to deliver a properly claimed horse to the successful claimant.
The claimed horse shall be disqualified from entering any race until delivery is made to the claimant.
(6) Obstructing rules of claiming.
No person or licensee shall obstruct or interfere with another person or licensee in claiming any horse or enter into any agreement with another to subvert or defeat the object and procedures of a claiming race, or attempt to prevent any horse entered from being claimed.
h. Elimination of stable.
An owner whose stable has been eliminated by claiming may claim for the remainder of the meeting at which eliminated or for 30 racing days, whichever is longer.
With the permission of the stewards, stables eliminated by fire or other casualty may claim under this rule. i. Deceptive claim.
The stewards may cancel and disallow any claim within 24 hours after a race if they determine that a claim was made upon the basis of a lease, sale, or entry of a horse made for the purpose of fraudulently obtaining the privilege of making a claim.
In the event of a disallowance, the stewards may further order the return of a horse to its original owner and the return of all claim moneys. j. Protest of claim.
A protest to any claim must be filed with the stewards before noon of the day following the date of the race in which the horse was claimed.
Nonracing days are excluded from this rule.
10.6(19) Quarter horse time trial races.
a.
Except in cases where the starting gate physically restricts the number of horses starting, each time trial shall consist of no more than ten horses.
b.
The time trials shall be raced under the same conditions as the finals.
If the time trials are conducted on the same day, the horses with the ten fastest times shall qualify to participate in the finals.
If the time trials are conducted on two days, the horses with the five fastest times on the first day and the horses with the five fastest times on the second day shall qualify to participate in the finals.
When time trials are conducted on two days, the racing office should make every attempt to split owners with more than one entry into separate days so that the owner's horses have a chance at all ten qualifying positions.
c.
If the facility's starting gate has fewer than ten stalls, then the maximum number of qualifiers will correspond to the maximum number of starting gate post positions.
d.
If only 11 or 12 horses are entered to run in time trials from a gate with 12 or more stalls, the 34 facility may choose to run finals only.
If 11 or 12 horses participate in the finals, only the first 10 finishers will receive purse money.
e.
In the time trials, horses shall qualify on the basis of time and order of finish.
The times of the horses in the time trial will be determined to the limit of the timer.
The only exception is when two or more horses have the same time in the same trial heat.
Then the order of finish shall also determine the preference in the horses'qualifying for the finals.
Should two or more horses in different time trials have the same qualifying time to the limit of the timer for the final qualifying position(s), then a draw by public lot shall be conducted as directed by the stewards.
Under no circumstances should stewards or placing judges attempt to determine horses' qualifying times in separate trials beyond the limit of the timer by comparing or enlarging photo finish picture.
f. Except in the case of disqualification, under no circumstances shall a horse qualify ahead of a horse that finished ahead of that horse in the official order of finish in a time trial.
g.
Should a horse be disqualified for interference during the running of a time trial, it shall receive the time of the horse it is immediately placed behind plus one hundredth of a second, or the maximum accuracy of the electronic timing device.
No adjustments will be made in the times recorded in the time trials to account for headwind, tailwind, and off track.
In the case where a horse is disqualified for interference with another horse causing loss of rider or the horse not to finish the race, the disqualified horse may be given no time plus one hundredth of a second, or the maximum accuracy of the electronic timing device.
h.
Should a malfunction occur with an electronic timer on any time trial, finalists from that time trial will then be determined by official hand times operated by three official and disinterested persons.
The average of the three hand times will be utilized for the winning time, unless one of the hand times is clearly incorrect.
In such cases, the average of the two accurate hand times will be utilized for the winning time.
The other horses in that race will be given times according to the order and margins of finish with the aid of the photo finish strip, if available.
i.
When there is a malfunction of the timer during the time trials, but the timer operates correctly in other time trials, under no circumstances should the accurate electronic times be discarded and the average of the hand times used for all time trials.
(The only exemption may be if the conditions of the stakes race so state, or state that, in the case of a malfunction of the timer in trials, finalists will be selected by order finish in the trials.)
j. In the case where the accuracy of the electronic timer or the average of the hand times is questioned, the video of a time trial may be used to estimate the winning time by counting the number of video frames in the race from the moment the starting gate stall doors are fully open parallel to the racing track.
This method is accurate to approximately .03 seconds.
Should the case arise where the timer malfunctions and there are no hand times, the stewards should have the option to select qualifiers based on the video time. k. Should there be a malfunction of the starting gate and one or more stall doors not open or open after the exact moment when the starter dispatches the field, the stewards may declare the horses in stalls with malfunctioning doors to be nonstarters.
The stewards should have the option, however, to allow any horse whose stall door opened late but still ran a time fast enough to qualify to be declared a starter for qualifying purposes.
In the case where a horse breaks through the stall door or the stall door opens prior to the exact moment the starter dispatches the 35 field, the horse must be declared a nonstarter and all entry fees refunded.
In the case where one or more, but not all, stall doors open at the exact moment the starter dispatches the field, these horses should be considered starters for qualifying purposes, and placed according to their electronic time.
If the electronic timer malfunctions in this instance, the average of the hand times, or, if not available, the video time, should be utilized for the horses that were declared starters. l.
There will be an also eligible list only in the case of a disqualification for a positive drug test report, ineligibility of the horse according to the conditions of the race, or a disqualification by the stewards for a rule violation.
Should a horse be disqualified for a positive drug test report, ineligibility of the horse according to the conditions of the race, or a disqualification by the stewards for a rule violation, the next fastest qualifier shall assume the disqualified horse's position in the finals. m.
If a horse should be scratched from the time trials, the horse's owner will not be eligible for a refund of the fees paid and that horse will not be allowed to enter the finals under any circumstances.
If a horse that qualified for the finals is unable to enter due to racing soundness or is scratched for any reason other than a positive drug test report or a rule violation, the horse shall be deemed to have earned, and the owner will receive, last place purse money.
If more than one horse is scratched from the finals for any reason other than a positive drug test report or a rule violation, then the purse moneys shall be added together and divided equally among the owners.
491--10.7(99D) Medication and administration, sample collection, chemists, and practicing veterinarian.
10.7(1) Medication and administration.
a.
No horse, while participating in a race, shall carry in its body any medication, drug, foreign substance, or metabolic derivative thereof, which is a narcotic or which could serve as a local anesthetic or tranquilizer or which could stimulate or depress the circulatory, respiratory, or central nervous system of a horse, thereby affecting its speed.
b.
Also prohibited are any drugs or foreign substances that might mask or screen the presence of the prohibited drugs, or prevent or delay testing procedures.
c. Proof of detection by the commission chemist of the presence of a medication, drug, foreign substance, or metabolic derivative thereof, prohibited by paragraph "a" or "b," in a saliva, urine, or blood sample duly taken under the supervision of the commission veterinarian from a horse immediately prior to or promptly after running in a race shall be prima facie evidence that the horse was administered, with the intent that it would carry or that it did carry in its body while running in a race, prohibited medication, drug, or foreign substance in violation of this rule. d. Administration or possession of drugs.
(1) No person shall administer, cause to be administered, or participate or attempt to participate in any way in the administration of any medication, drug, foreign substance, or treatment by any route, to a horse registered for racing on the day of the race prior to the race in which the horse is entered.
(2) No person except a veterinarian shall have in the person's possession any prescription drug.
However, a person may possess a noninjectable prescription drug for animal use if: 1.
The person actually possesses, within the racetrack enclosure, documentary evidence that a 36 prescription has been issued to said person for such a prescription drug.
2.
The prescription contains a specific dosage for the particular horse or horses to be treated by the prescription drug.
3.
The horse or horses named in the prescription are then in said person's care within the racetrack enclosure.
(3) No veterinarian or any other person shall have in their possession or administer to any horse within any racetrack enclosure any chemical substance which: 1.
Has not been approved for use on equines by the Food and Drug Administration pursuant to the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C.
Section 301 et seq., and implementing regulations, without the prior written approval from a commission veterinarian, after consulting with the board of stewards.
2.
Is on any of the schedules of controlled substances as prepared by the Attorney General of the United States pursuant to 21 U.S.C.
Sections 811 and 812, without the prior written approval from a commission veterinarian after consultation with the board of stewards.
The commission veterinarian shall not give such approval unless the person seeking the approval can produce evidence in recognized veterinary journals or by recognized equine experts that such chemical substance has a beneficial therapeutic use in horses.
(4) No veterinarian or any other person shall dispense, sell, or furnish any feed supplement, tonic, veterinary preparation, medication, or any substance that can be administered or applied to a horse by any route, to any person within the grounds of the facility unless there is a label specifying the name of the substance dispensed, the name of the dispensing person, the name of the horse or horses for which the substance is dispensed, the purpose for which said substance is dispensed, the dispensing veterinarian's recommendations for withdrawal before racing (if applicable), and the name of the person to whom dispensed, or is otherwise labeled as required by law.
(5) No person shall have in the person's possession or in areas under said person's responsibility on facility grounds any feed supplement, tonic, veterinary preparation, medication, or any substance that can be administered or applied to a horse by any route unless it complies with the labeling requirements in 10.7(1)"d"(4). e.
Any person found to have administered, or caused, participated in, or attempted to participate in any way in the administration of a medication, drug, or foreign substance that caused or could have caused a violation of this rule, shall be subject to disciplinary action.
f.
The owner, trainer, groom, or any other person having charge, custody, or care of the horse is obligated to protect the horse properly and guard it against the administration or attempted administration of a substance in violation of this rule.
If the stewards find that any person has failed to show proper protection and guarding of the horse, or if the stewards find that any owner, lessee, or trainer is guilty of negligence, they shall impose discipline and take other action they deem proper under any of the rules including referral to the commission.
g.
In order for a horse to be placed on the bleeder list in Iowa through reciprocity, that horse must be certified as a bleeder in another state or jurisdiction.
A certified bleeder is a horse that has raced with lasix in another state or jurisdiction in compliance with the laws governing lasix in that state or jurisdiction.
10.7(2) Sample collection.
a.
Under the supervision of the commission veterinarian, urine, blood, and other specimens 37 shall be taken and tested from any horse that the stewards, commission veterinarian, or the commission's representatives may designate.
The samples shall be collected by the commission veterinarian or other person or persons the commission may designate.
Each sample shall be marked or numbered and bear information essential to its proper analysis; but the identity of the horse from which the sample was taken or the identity of its owners or trainer shall not be revealed to the official chemist or the staff of the chemist.
The container of each sample shall be sealed as soon as the sample is placed therein.
b.
A facility shall have a detention barn under the supervision of the commission veterinarian for the purpose of collecting body fluid samples for any tests required by the commission.
The building, location, arrangement, furnishings, and facilities including refrigeration and hot and cold running water must be approved by the commission.
A security guard, approved by the commission, must be in attendance at each access to the detention barn during the hours designated by the commission.
c.
No unauthorized person shall be admitted at any time to the building or the area utilized for the purpose of collecting the required body fluid samples or the area designated for the retention of horses pending the obtaining of body fluid samples.
d.
During the taking of samples from a horse, the owner, responsible trainer, or a representative designated by the owner or trainer may be present and witness the taking of the sample and so signify in writing.
Failure to be present and witness the collection of the samples constitutes a waiver by the owner, trainer, or representative of any objections to the source and documentation of the sample.
e.
The commission veterinarian, the board of stewards, agents of the division of criminal investigation, or commission representative may take samples of any medicine or other materials suspected of containing improper medication, drugs, or other substance which could affect the racing condition of a horse in a race, which may be found in barns or elsewhere on facility grounds or in the possession of any person connected with racing, and the same shall be delivered to the official chemist for analysis.
f. Nothing in these rules shall be construed to prevent: (1) Any horse in any race from being subjected by the order of a steward or the commission veterinarian to tests of body fluid samples for the purpose of determining the presence of any foreign substance.
(2) The state steward or the commission veterinarian from authorizing the splitting of any sample.
(3) The commission or commission veterinarian from requiring body fluid samples to be stored in a frozen state for future analysis.
g. Before leaving the racing surface, the trainer shall ascertain the testing status of the horse under the trainer's care from the commission veterinarian or designated detention barn representative.
10.7(3) Chemists. a.
Tests are to be under the supervision of the commission, which shall employ one or more chemists or contract with one or more qualified chemical laboratories to determine by chemical testing and analysis of body fluid samples whether a foreign substance, medication, drug or metabolic derivative thereof is present.
b.
All body fluid samples taken by or under direction of the commission veterinarian or 38 commission representative shall be delivered to the laboratory of the official chemist for analysis.
c.
The commission chemist shall be responsible for safeguarding and testing each sample delivered to the laboratory by the commission veterinarian. d.
The commission chemist shall conduct individual tests on each sample, screening them for prohibited substances, and conducting other tests to detect and identify any suspected prohibited substance or metabolic derivative thereof with specificity.
Pooling of samples shall be permitted only with the knowledge and approval of the commission.
e. Upon the finding of a test negative for prohibited substances, the remaining portions of the sample may be discarded.
Upon the finding of tests suspicious or positive for prohibited substances, the tests shall be reconfirmed, and the remaining portion, if available, of the sample shall be preserved and protected for two years following close of meet. f.
The commission chemist shall submit to the commission a written report as to each sample tested, indicating by sample tag identification number, whether the sample was tested negative or positive for prohibited substances.
The commission chemist shall report test findings to no person other than the administrator or commission representative, with the exception of notifying the state stewards of all positive tests.
g.
In the event the commission chemist should find a sample suspicious for a prohibited medication, additional time for test analysis and confirmation may be requested.
h.
In reporting to the state steward a finding of a test positive for a prohibited substance, the commission chemist shall present documentary or demonstrative evidence acceptable in the scientific community and admissible in court in support of the professional opinion as to the positive finding.
i. No action shall be taken by the state steward until an official report signed by the chemist properly identifying the medication, drug, or other substance as well as the horse from which the sample was taken has been received.
j.
The cost of the testing and analysis shall be paid by the commission to the official chemist.
The commission shall then be reimbursed by each facility on a per-sample basis so that each facility shall bear only its proportion of the total cost of testing and analysis.
The commission may first receive payment from funds provided in Iowa Code chapter 99D, if available.
10.7(4) Practicing veterinarian. a.
Prohibited acts.
(1) Ownership.
A licensed veterinarian practicing at any meeting is prohibited from possessing any ownership, directly or indirectly, in any racing animal racing during the meeting.
(2) Wagering.
Veterinarians licensed by the commission as veterinarians are prohibited from placing any wager of money or other thing of value directly or indirectly on the outcome of any race conducted at the meeting at which the veterinarian is furnishing professional service.
(3) Prohibition of furnishing injectable materials.
No veterinarian shall within the facility grounds furnish, sell, or loan any hypodermic syringe, needle, or other injection device, or any drug, narcotic, or prohibited substance to any other person unless with written permission of the stewards. b.
The use of other than single-use disposable syringes and infusion tubes on facility grounds is prohibited.
Whenever a veterinarian has used a hypodermic needle or syringe the veterinarian shall destroy the needle and syringe and remove the needle and syringe from the facility grounds.
c. Veterinarians must submit daily to the commission veterinarian on a prescribed form a 39 report of all medications and other substances which the veterinarian prescribed, administered, or dispensed for racing animals registered at the current race meeting as provided in Iowa Code section 99D.25(10).
Reports shall be submitted not later than noon the day following the treatments being reported.
Reports shall include the racing animal, trainer, medication or other substance, dosage or quantity, route of administration, date and time administered, dispensed, or prescribed.
d.
Within 20 minutes following the administration of lasix, the veterinarian must deliver to the commission veterinarian or commission representative a signed affidavit certifying information regarding the treatment of the horse.
The statement must include, at a minimum, the name of the practicing veterinarian, the tattoo number of the horse, the location of the barn and stall where the treatment occurred, the race number of the horse, the name of the trainer, and the time that the lasix was administered.
Lasix shall only be administered in a dose level of 250 milligrams.
e.
Each veterinarian shall report immediately to the commission veterinarian any illness presenting unusual or unknown symptoms in a racing animal entrusted into the veterinarian's care. f. Practicing veterinarians may have employees licensed as veterinary assistants working under their direct supervision.
Activities of these employees shall not include direct treatment or diagnosis of any animal.
The practicing veterinarian must be present if a veterinary assistant is to have access to injection devices or injectables.
The practicing veterinarian shall assume all responsibility for a veterinary assistant.
g. Equine dentistry is considered a function of veterinary practice by the Iowa veterinary practice Act.
Any dental procedures performed at the facility must be performed by a licensed veterinarian or a licensed veterinary assistant.
These rules are intended to implement Iowa Code chapter 99D.
40
